Massachusetts, session 194th, S3188.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Buzzards 
Bay Water District, acting by and through its Board of Water Commissioners, may convey to 
Algonquin Gas Transmission, LLC, upon such terms and conditions and for the fair market value 
or value in use, whichever is greater, as determined by an appraisal, non-exclusive permanent 
and temporary easements, for the installation, operation, maintenance, repair and replacement of 
natural gas pipelines and related appurtenances, an access road, and temporary workspace, under 
and through portions of property described in subsection (b). The Buzzards Bay Water District 
shall deposit into and hold the consideration for the permanent easement and access road in a 
segregated account dedicated solely for the acquisition and maintenance of land for the purposes 
of article 97 of the amendments to the constitution of the Commonwealth and shall use such 

of 2 11 monies to acquire land or an interest in land for article 97 purposes within 3 years after the 
conveyance. 
(b) The property on which the easements may be granted is located at Bournedale Road, 
Bourne, which property is identified as Assessor‘s Parcel 10-52-0, and described in a deed 
recorded with the Barnstable County Registry of Deeds in Book 2751, Page 145. The easements 
that may be granted on the property are more particularly shown on a plan entitled “Plan of Land 
Buzzards Bay Water District Bournedale Road, Bourne, Massachusetts,” dated April 27, 2026, 
prepared by VHB, as said plan may be amended, a copy of which plan is on file with the 
Buzzards Bay Water District Clerk. The easements shown on the plan shall be for the benefit of 
Algonquin Gas Transmission, LLC. 
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.